dictionaries/aoo-mozilla-en-dict/dicts/en_GB (-ize) (Oxford)/en_GB-oxendict.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX D Y 35
SFX D 0 bed [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX D 0 d [^e]e 
SFX D e d [^or]ee 
SFX D 0 d [or]ee 
SFX D 0 ded [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX D 0 ed [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX D 0 ed [^ai][lvbmpndcg][oe]r 
SFX D 0 ed [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz] 
SFX D 0 ed [a][bvpm][o][r] 
SFX D 0 ed [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgkmnprstvz] 
SFX D 0 ed [aeio][eiou]l 
SFX D 0 ed [aeiou]y 
SFX D 0 ed [aeo]al 
SFX D 0 ed [ao]log 
SFX D 0 ed [emfos][eniua][tb][e]r 
SFX D 0 fed [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX D 0 ged [^aeiol][aeiou]g 
SFX D 0 ged [^ao][l][aeiou]g 
SFX D y ied [^aeiou]y 
SFX D 0 ked [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX D 0 ked [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX D 0 led [^aeio][eiou]l 
SFX D 0 led [^aeo]al 
SFX D 0 med [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX D 0 ned [^aeio][aeiou]n 
SFX D 0 ped [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX D 0 red [^enoarhiubc][vlmjptwfchb][aeiou]r 
SFX D 0 red [^lfeas][^iobrswhu][vb][aeou]r 
SFX D 0 red [^nsecbwo][^aeiovblmpntd][aeiou]r 
SFX D 0 red [bc][hl][aeiou]r 
SFX D 0 red [icdro][enc][mtfc][aeiou]r 
SFX D 0 sed [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX D 0 ted [^aeio][aeiou]t 
SFX D 0 ved [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX D 0 zed [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX d Y 16
SFX d 0 d e 
SFX d 0 ed [^aeiou][cl] 
SFX d 0 ed [^ecly] 
SFX d 0 ed [aeimo][aeiou][cl] 
SFX d 0 ed [aeiou]y 
SFX d y ied [^aeiou]y 
SFX d 0 ing [^aeiou][cl] 
SFX d 0 ing [^ecl] 
SFX d e ing [^eioy]e 
SFX d 0 ing [aeimo][aeiou][cl] 
SFX d 0 ing [eoy]e 
SFX d 0 ked [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX d 0 king [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX d 0 led [^aeimo][aeiou]l 
SFX d 0 ling [^aemio][aeiou]l 
SFX d ie ying ie 
SFX h Y 22
SFX h 0 bedly [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX h 0 dedly [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX h 0 dly e 
SFX h 0 edly [^aeio][eo][nrt] 
SFX h 0 edly [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX h 0 edly [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz] 
SFX h 0 edly [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX h 0 edly [aeiou]y 
SFX h 0 fedly [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX h 0 gedly [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX h y iedly [^aeiou]y 
SFX h 0 kedly [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX h 0 kedly [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX h 0 ledly [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX h 0 medly [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX h 0 nedly [^aeio][aiou]n 
SFX h 0 pedly [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX h 0 redly [^aeiomb][aiou]r 
SFX h 0 sedly [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX h 0 tedly [^aeio][aiou]t 
SFX h 0 vedly [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX h 0 zedly [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX i Y 66
SFX i 0 bedness [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX i 0 bedness's [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX i 0 bednesses [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX i 0 dedness [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX i 0 dedness's [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX i 0 dednesses [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX i 0 dness e 
SFX i 0 dness's e 
SFX i 0 dnesses e 
SFX i 0 edness [^aeio][eo][nrt] 
SFX i 0 edness [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX i 0 edness [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz] 
SFX i 0 edness [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX i 0 edness [aeiou]y 
SFX i 0 edness's [^aeio][eo][nrt] 
SFX i 0 edness's [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX i 0 edness's [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz] 
SFX i 0 edness's [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX i 0 edness's [aeiou]y 
SFX i 0 ednesses [^aeio][eo][nrt] 
SFX i 0 ednesses [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX i 0 ednesses [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz] 
SFX i 0 ednesses [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX i 0 ednesses [aeiou]y 
SFX i 0 fedness [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX i 0 fedness's [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX i 0 fednesses [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX i 0 gedness [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX i 0 gedness's [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX i 0 gednesses [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX i y iedness [^aeiou]y 
SFX i y iedness's [^aeiou]y 
SFX i y iednesses [^aeiou]y 
SFX i 0 kedness [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX i 0 kedness [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX i 0 kedness's [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX i 0 kedness's [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX i 0 kednesses [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX i 0 kednesses [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX i 0 ledness [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX i 0 ledness's [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX i 0 lednesses [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX i 0 medness [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX i 0 medness's [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX i 0 mednesses [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX i 0 nedness [^aeio][aiou]n 
SFX i 0 nedness's [^aeio][aiou]n 
SFX i 0 nednesses [^aeio][aiou]n 
SFX i 0 pedness [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX i 0 pedness's [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX i 0 pednesses [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX i 0 redness [^aeiobl][aiou]r 
SFX i 0 redness's [^aeiobl][aiou]r 
SFX i 0 rednesses [^aeiobl][aiou]r 
SFX i 0 sedness [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX i 0 sedness's [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX i 0 sednesses [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX i 0 tedness [^aeio][aiou]t 
SFX i 0 tedness's [^aeio][aiou]t 
SFX i 0 tednesses [^aeio][aiou]t 
SFX i 0 vedness [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX i 0 vedness's [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX i 0 vednesses [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX i 0 zedness [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX i 0 zedness's [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX i 0 zednesses [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX T Y 42
SFX T 0 ber [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX T 0 best [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX T 0 der [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX T 0 dest [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX T 0 er [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX T 0 er [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz]
SFX T 0 er [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX T 0 er [aeiou]y 
SFX T 0 est [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX T 0 est [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz]
SFX T 0 est [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX T 0 est [aeiou]y
SFX T 0 fer [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX T 0 fest [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX T 0 ger [^aeio][aeiou]g 
SFX T 0 gest [^aeio][aeiou]g
SFX T y ier [^aeiou]y 
SFX T y iest [^aeiou]y
SFX T 0 ker [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX T 0 ker [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX T 0 kest [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX T 0 kest [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX T 0 ler [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX T 0 lest [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX T 0 mer [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX T 0 mest [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX T 0 ner [^aeio][aeiou]n 
SFX T 0 nest [^aeio][aeiou]n
SFX T 0 per [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX T 0 pest [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX T 0 r e 
SFX T 0 rer [^aeio][aeiou]r 
SFX T 0 rest [^aeio][aeiou]r
SFX T 0 ser [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX T 0 sest [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX T 0 st e
SFX T 0 ter [^aeio][aeiou]t 
SFX T 0 test [^aeio][aeiou]t
SFX T 0 ver [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX T 0 vest [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX T 0 zer [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX T 0 zest [^aeio][aeiou]z
