dictionaries/aoo-mozilla-en-dict/dicts/en_GB (-ize) (Oxford)/en_GB-oxendict.dic
abridge/RDGSLh
abrupt/YPTh
abstract/MDShTVPGYr
accelerate/kGnSDVh
accept/DBSRVGkhl
acknowledge/LRGShD
acquit/DGSR
adapt/GVSniBuvRl
adept/MTPYS
advise/BLRSGDlh
affect/Mrp=hVvnkDiSG
age/MihpSD
agglutinate/nVGDS
aggrieve/DhSGi
agitate/DVGSnh
agree/dESLlG
alarm/SkGD3Mh
alert/MPhSDRTYG
allege/ShnDG
allow/7DSGhl
amaze/SGkhDLM
amiable/YTP
amplify/DRGSn
amuse/RSkLVhDG
anchor/m5dSM
appropriate/GnaDS
ashen/Sd
ashy/T
assume/hGBSDVRk
astonish/SLkDG
author/O-9d8SMp
avert/DSbGh
await/SDG
backhand/hRMSGD
backscatter/dMS
bald/PGYTDZSM
bandy/DTSGM
banner/d
barb/SRGMDi
barmy/PYRT
bas/Sd1Oo
bayonet/dMS
beamy/T
beard/pSGiDM
bedevil/LDGS
bedizen/Sd
belate/Dih
bemuse/DLhSG
besom/SdM
bestialize/DGS
bewhisker/Sd
bewilder/idLhSk
bigot/ydSM
bitchy/T
bitter/MYPSd
blade/GDMSp
blanket/dSM
bless/hGSDiJ
blingy/T
blister/dMkSZ
blood/SGZiDMphzR~
blotchy/T
blunt/MYPGTSD~
blur/hGDZSM
bluster/rSZdkM
bobble/SGMDY
bonnet/dSM
bosomy/T
bottom/dSMr
braid/DGSJrM
brander/dSM
brassy/TSMP
brighten/drS
briny/TPM
brother/dYSM
brusque/PTY
bubble/GYSMD
budget/rSdM
bullhead/hMDSi
bunchy/T
burden/dMS
cable/DGSMp
calculate/iVDSGkBhn
calender/dMS
calm/YTGPSkDM
cantilever/dSM
carbo-load/SGD
carton/dMS
ceiling/MSD
celebrate/inSDyG
chaffer/rdM
charming/TSM
chasten/Sd
cheery/T
chill/TDk2PRGMYS
chirpy/PYT
chorus/MdS
clammy/TP
clamour/GMDRS
clatter/dSZkrM
cludgy/T
co-author/SMd
co-found/SDGr
coffin/dMS
comely/PT
commemorate/DvSVGn
complicate/h
concede/Rh
conceit/GiMSDh
concern/hUD
concert/DiGhSM
confess/GxhD
confiscate/ynSGD
confound/GSh
confuse/kRhi
connect/viVbGhDS7
constrain/hG
consume/RVSXvkNDhGJ
coop/DGSM
cooper/SMdvuV
cosponsor/MSd
cosy/MSGDYTP
counterpunch/GSDR
cow/ShGMDm
crab/SZiMzRDhGá
cranky/TP
crater/d
crinkly/TS
critique/MGSD
crook/DSiMhG
croquet/SdM
crumbly/TP
curb/MDSG
curious/TPY
curs/GyihSD
cuss/DhiSGM
daffy/TP
dander/SdM
date/7MGVRSiphD
daze/DiSGhM
dead/MPTY
dealign/DGL
debauch/yGhSiDR
decipher/dL7rS
dedicate/h
defalcate/GDSn
degrade/hki
deject/GiDhS
delight/6jhGiM
demolish/DSGR
deprave/rGiShDNk
deregister/Sd
deserve/Gkih
design/DShJ7VxnM
desorb/SGD
detach/GRSiLhD7
determine/uDRBvGVhiS
deuce/DGhMS
devout/TYP
dilate/hiVGnDSy
dillydally/SGD
dire/PTj6Y
disadvantage/i
disappoint/khLSGDr
discolour/DniGJ
disconnect/RiG
disempower/LSd
disguise/GRDh
disgust/MSk6jhGD
disincentivize/SGD
disinterest/i
disorder/hi
displease/h
distract/DkihGb
dodgy/T
dog/RhZGiMSDá
dogleg/SGDM
dollop/dSM
dour/PTY
dreary/TP
dredge/GRMSD
drunk/TMSY
dumbfound/SGDir
dusty/TP
ebb/GDSM
egghead/MiDS
elate/iSDGnhR
elicit/dSn
elongate/YDSnGh
embarrass/kLDhSG
embay/SGD
empanel/Sd
empty/SGDTPM
enchant/h
enforce/ShGDLBRb
enframe/SGD
engender/dS
engross/LDSGhkr
enure/DSG
evanish/DGSL
even/YdSPJ
evolve/RDGShL
exaggerate/SnvhiGVD
exalt/RnhSDG
excite/lknGLRDSBh
expect/nShGDi7k
expire/ynDSZG
eye/7RSpMD6iG
fade/MhSp
faggot/dSM
fantasy/38W9DSGM
fast/TGPSDM
fathead/MSDi
fee/GMYSd
fell/GSTD
figgy/T
film/ZSDMGW
fin/1SdMwoGZD7p
fixate/GVnSDh
fizzy/T
fleshly/T
flint/ZSGMD2p
flitter/Sd
flouncy/T
folksy/TP
foot/GSRDJhipMZ
force/Dh6jGbMSR
foreclose/SGD
foregather/Sd
foresight/SMiDh
foxy/TP
freehand/Dh
fresco/SMGDé
friendly/TU
frighten/Sdkr
frowzy/TPY
frustrate/hDSknGr
furry/TRP
gain/ASDG
gap/GdkSMDr
gash/DMGTS
gazunder/Sd
geeky/TPY
geocache/SMGDR
gift/hGDSMi
glad/MSDZPGTY
gladden/dS
glossy/TSMP
glut/SMGD
gollop/MSd
googly/SMT
grateful/TP
greet/DRGSJ
grimy/PTY
gross/YSDTPGM
guard/RmGDhMiS
guilty/TP
gutter/SdM
guzzle/DRGSM
hairy/PTY
halfwit/hiSMD
hand/h6RzZSipMGD2
harbour/prSdM
harsh/PTY
hast/zZ2D
head/DRzGm2pihMZJS
headquarter/Sd	Verb
heart/pS2zZMihDG
heavy/YMSPT~
hillock/SMZD
hinder/dr
hoary/PTY
hood/DGMiS
horn/3rMSZ2piGDá
hostel/DRMSyG
hothead/SDihM
hover/dSrM
huffy/TP
hurry/rDhGSiMk
hyphy/MT
hypnotize/DSGRn
imprison/LSd
improve/DLr
infract/SGD
ingrain/Mh
innocent/TYSM
intend/uhViv
interconnect/GDiS
interdict/DGMVS
interest/EDhSMG
interrelate/SnGihD
intoxicate/GDhnS
inurn/DGS
jabber/SdrJM
jade/iDMhS
jag/ZDhGiSM
jet-set/DGR
jiggly/T
juicy/YPT
junket/SdM
keyboard/GMDRS3
kingly/TP
labour/JShRikGDM
lacquer/SrdM
laggy/T
lament/SMnDlG7r
lavish/DPTSGY
leather/SMZd2
left-hand/DiRh
lemony/T
lesion/GDMS
liken/dS
linty/T
loath/RPDGJY
lobster/dSM
lonely/TP
lousy/TPY
mad/RTYPGD
mail/RS7GDMJ
maim/RGSDi
major/MSdY
mark/iRmDJhGSM7
mat/dRMDJGS
maul/DRSGM
mazy/TY
messy/TP
microfiche/SGDM
mind/phSiR6DjMG
minister/dnSMo
misguide/hi
mislive/SGD
misty/TP
mop/ZkdSGrMD~
moralize/CnSDG
mortify/GhnSDr
mottle/SGDir
mournful/TP
muddlehead/MDi
multitrack/SGDMr
muscly/T
muster/Sd
narky/T
nature/ohMDS
nerve/UGSD
nitty/T
nurse/RMJSDG
offer/rJd
offhand/iDh
oppress/VuSvDG
outpoint/DGS
overnumber/Sd
overshadow/SGD
pale/DTSYGPM
palter/Sdr
pantomime/3SMDG
parrot/MSdá
peak/DM2SiGZ
pectinate/DN
pepper/Zdr
perfect/hrbDYTuPSGVv
perky/TP
perplex/ihDGSk
persuade/DVRSvuG
pervert/RGiShDM
pilgrim/dMS
pilgrimage/MSDG
pinhead/SDiM
playact/Sd
pledge/GDMSr
plucky/TP
point/RhSpGiMDZ
pollute/iGDSRh
pool/GSDM
posses/GhDi
potter/dZr
potty/TS
pre-prepare/D
premeditate/hDGS
premiere/DGOSdM
presume/rvDSGVkl
pronounce/h
propitiate/ynSDG
prosper/dS
pudgy/TP
purfle/SMGDJ
purport/RGDSh
queer/PMSTGDY~
quieten/Sd
quoth/SGD
r/d
rag/diGkMSDh
rap/d3RDGSM
re-route/GSD
re/nxhoYJNi
ready/TSDPG
rebuffer/Sd
reconceptualize/SGD
refloat/SGD
regather/dS
rekiss/SGD
relax/SGiDnkh
relieve/SGDhR
reorder/Sd
reperfume/SGD
report/h7GM
reserve/nih3
resign/6inh
reslash/SGD
restrain/Gh
reveal/RSD7Gk
right-hand/iDr
rivet/drSMk
roil/DGSZ
root/ZSGMDpiRá
rootsy/T
round/MGiSDPYRT~
rug/hSMDi
rusticate/SGDn
sad/T3PY
sandpaper/MdS
scarp/DGSM
scary/TY
scissor/SdM
scythe/GSMD
seedy/TP
shadow/DGp2ZMSr
sham/SGMdD
share/7SRGDMi
shiny/TP
shorten/dJS
shriek/GMSRDk
sight/Dhr
silvery/T
sinter/Md
skill/MSDp
slacken/dS
slimy/T
sliver/dSM
slump/GDSM
smily/TSM
snicker/SdM
sniffly/T
snuff/MDSGYRZ
sorry/TPY
spearhead/GSMD
spirit/IdSM
spongy/TY
spur/GDMSp
squee/Sd
squirmy/T
state/M6h
steepen/dS
stenograph/SGDZRM
still/SDPTGZ
stilt/MhiSD
stringy/PTY
strop/SMDG
stunt/iSDGM
stutter/rSdk
subtilize/DGS
sulphur/MdSW
supple/LYPT
surmount/G7DS
sweeten/drS
tangy/TP
tap/drRDMGSp
telex/SDGM
tender/Pd8Y9
testy/TYP
thwart/kSDGrMh
TikTok/SGDdMrZ
tipsy/TP
totter/rMkdSZ
touse/SGDM
trigger/SdA
turfy/T
twinge/DMGS
unbound/iDh
uncloister/Sd
underhand/hi
unite/h
unmark/SGDi
unmellow/D
unsettle/kiL
usher/dSM
vain/TYP
verdure/DSMp
voice-over/SMd
wan/dY
weedy/T
welter/d
westernize/SGDNR
wick/hiRSGDJM
wiggly/T
wimp/MSZd~
woolly/TSMP
worry/MRDkSGh
wretch/MiDhS
yowl/GSDM
zippy/T
